ug.aff
FLAG num
SFX 5230 N 1
SFX 5230 0 ۈكلۈك .

SFX 5231 N 1
SFX 5231 0 تۈشۈش .

SFX 5232 N 1
SFX 5232 0 يەتلەرگە .

SFX 5233 N 1
SFX 5233 0 چىلىكمۇ .

SFX 5234 N 1
SFX 5234 0 اسىمۇ .

SFX 5235 N 1
SFX 5235 0 زائىل .

SFX 5236 N 1
SFX 5236 0 ندنىڭ .

SFX 5237 N 1
SFX 5237 0 سىنۇس .

SFX 5238 N 1
SFX 5238 0 ندىم .

SFX 5239 N 1
SFX 5239 0 دۈرۈك .

SFX 5240 N 1
SFX 5240 0 سلىرىغا .

SFX 5241 N 1
SFX 5241 0 انىچە .

SFX 5242 N 1
SFX 5242 0 ۋانە .

SFX 5243 N 1
SFX 5243 0 چىلىكتىكى .

SFX 5244 N 1
SFX 5244 0 رگەنلىكى .

SFX 5245 N 1
SFX 5245 0 ېتىنى .

SFX 5246 N 1
SFX 5246 0 تكەنلىك .

SFX 5247 N 1
SFX 5247 0 ۋاتتىن .

SFX 5248 N 1
SFX 5248 0 تكىسى .

SFX 5249 N 1
SFX 5249 0 ۋالغىنىغا .

SFX 5250 N 1
SFX 5250 0 نىيەلىك .

SFX 5251 N 1
SFX 5251 0 ەتچىگە .

SFX 5252 N 1
SFX 5252 0 گەم .

SFX 5253 N 1
SFX 5253 0 ىغىنىڭىزغا .

SFX 5254 N 1
SFX 5254 0 خۇش .

SFX 5255 N 1
SFX 5255 0 الىلار .

SFX 5256 N 1
SFX 5256 0 ىپىگە .

SFX 5257 N 1
SFX 5257 0 ەلمىگەنلىكىنى .

SFX 5258 N 1
SFX 5258 0 تلىدى .

SFX 5259 N 1
SFX 5259 0 ىرچى .

SFX 5260 N 1
SFX 5260 0 انادىن .

SFX 5261 N 1
SFX 5261 0 شتۇرغۇچى .

SFX 5262 N 1
SFX 5262 0 گۈچىلەر .

SFX 5263 N 1
SFX 5263 0 مدىكىسى .

SFX 5264 N 1
SFX 5264 0 ىدىغانلىقى .

SFX 5265 N 1
SFX 5265 0 قانلا .

SFX 5266 N 1
SFX 5266 0 ۋەتكەنلىكى .

SFX 5267 N 1
SFX 5267 0 ۈزىگە .

SFX 5268 N 1
SFX 5268 0 پكىسىنى .

SFX 5269 N 1
SFX 5269 0 مىر .

SFX 5270 N 1
SFX 5270 0 كلەردەك .

SFX 5271 N 1
SFX 5271 0 وقماق .

SFX 5272 N 1
SFX 5272 0 ۋەتتىم .

SFX 5273 N 1
SFX 5273 0 ىشىمچە .

SFX 5274 N 1
SFX 5274 0 بىڭىز .

SFX 5275 N 1
SFX 5275 0 يەلەيسىز .

SFX 5276 N 1
SFX 5276 0 تسىڭىز .

SFX 5277 N 1
SFX 5277 0 ىدىغانغا .

SFX 5278 N 1
SFX 5278 0 گەيسىلەر .

SFX 5279 N 1
SFX 5279 0 ورىدا .

SFX 5280 N 1
SFX 5280 0 شتۇرساق .

SFX 5281 N 1
SFX 5281 0 لىشار .

SFX 5282 N 1
SFX 5282 0 تۇڭمۇ .

SFX 5283 N 1
SFX 5283 0 ۈزى .

SFX 5284 N 1
SFX 5284 0 ىتىڭىزنىڭ .

SFX 5285 N 1
SFX 5285 0 ىيىشماق .

SFX 5286 N 1
SFX 5286 0 لىدى .

SFX 5287 N 1
SFX 5287 0 ىلگەچكە .

SFX 5288 N 1
SFX 5288 0 يالاي .

SFX 5289 N 1
SFX 5289 0 گۈچتە .

SFX 5290 N 1
SFX 5290 0 شا .

SFX 5291 N 1
SFX 5291 0 لاپ .

SFX 5292 N 1
SFX 5292 0 نەكلەر .

SFX 5293 N 1
SFX 5293 0 قچىلىق .

SFX 5294 N 1
SFX 5294 0 ۈپەت .

SFX 5295 N 1
SFX 5295 0 خاخا .

SFX 5296 N 1
SFX 5296 0 ىغۇچتىن .

SFX 5297 N 1
SFX 5297 0 مەسلىكنى .

SFX 5298 N 1
SFX 5298 0 سلىشىش .

SFX 5299 N 1
SFX 5299 0 الىدا .

SFX 5300 N 1
SFX 5300 0 ىلەپسىز .

SFX 5301 N 1
SFX 5301 0 ھتۇر .

SFX 5302 N 1
SFX 5302 0 ئېھسان .

SFX 5303 N 1
SFX 5303 0 ملىككە .

SFX 5304 N 1
SFX 5304 0 نىدى .

SFX 5305 N 1
SFX 5305 0 ئاسمان .

SFX 5306 N 1
SFX 5306 0 ۇمغىمۇ .

SFX 5307 N 1
SFX 5307 0 لەرگىچە .

SFX 5308 N 1
SFX 5308 0 للىرىدىكى .

SFX 5309 N 1
SFX 5309 0 لەندۈرۈشۈش .

SFX 5310 N 1
SFX 5310 0 ىنىشماق .

SFX 5311 N 1
SFX 5311 0 ۇقكى .

SFX 5312 N 1
SFX 5312 0 شۇناسلىقىدىكى .

SFX 5313 N 1
SFX 5313 0 ىستلارنىڭ .

SFX 5314 N 1
SFX 5314 0 ۈرەلەيدىغان .

SFX 5315 N 1
SFX 5315 0 ۇلدىشىش .

SFX 5316 N 1
SFX 5316 0 چنى .

SFX 5317 N 1
SFX 5317 0 ڭلىما .

SFX 5318 N 1
SFX 5318 0 تاسىغا .

SFX 5319 N 1
SFX 5319 0 ملىتىش .

SFX 5320 N 1
SFX 5320 0 ايسىز .

SFX 5321 N 1
SFX 5321 0 شلىكنى .

SFX 5322 N 1
SFX 5322 0 ەپلىرىڭىز .

SFX 5323 N 1
SFX 5323 0 ۇزە .

SFX 5324 N 1
SFX 5324 0 ئۇدۇل .

SFX 5325 N 1
SFX 5325 0 لغانلارغا .

SFX 5326 N 1
SFX 5326 0 ننىلا .

SFX 5327 N 1
SFX 5327 0 ۋەتكەندەك .

SFX 5328 N 1
SFX 5328 0 غنىڭ .

SFX 5329 N 1
SFX 5329 0 لاردىمۇ .

SFX 5330 N 1
SFX 5330 0 سلىقىمنى .

SFX 5331 N 1
SFX 5331 0 اشماق .

SFX 5332 N 1
SFX 5332 0 غانلىقىدەك .

SFX 5333 N 1
SFX 5333 0 ەنمەيدۇ .

SFX 5334 N 1
SFX 5334 0 ۇدەكمەن .

SFX 5335 N 1
SFX 5335 0 تتۇق .

SFX 5336 N 1
SFX 5336 0 ەتمەكچى .

SFX 5337 N 1
SFX 5337 0 ەرلەردىن .

SFX 5338 N 1
SFX 5338 0 دەم .

SFX 5339 N 1
SFX 5339 0 ەپلەش .

SFX 5340 N 1
SFX 5340 0 اقا .

SFX 5341 N 1
SFX 5341 0 ۈنلا .

SFX 5342 N 1
SFX 5342 0 ۈرۈلىدىغان .

SFX 5343 N 1
SFX 5343 0 دقا .

SFX 5344 N 1
SFX 5344 0 ىمەنغۇ .

SFX 5345 N 1
SFX 5345 0 تىدى .

SFX 5346 N 1
SFX 5346 0 چانلىقىدىن .

SFX 5347 N 1
SFX 5347 0 ماسمىكىن .

SFX 5348 N 1
SFX 5348 0 ەكلە .

SFX 5349 N 1
SFX 5349 0 ۋالغانلىقىغا .

SFX 5350 N 1
SFX 5350 0 وف .

SFX 5351 N 1
SFX 5351 0 ەشتى .

SFX 5352 N 1
SFX 5352 0 تەككە .

SFX 5353 N 1
SFX 5353 0 ېنىنى .

SFX 5354 N 1
SFX 5354 0 لىدىغانلارنىڭ .

SFX 5355 N 1
SFX 5355 0 ىشمۇ .

SFX 5356 N 1
SFX 5356 0 ۇۋاتقانلىقىنى .

SFX 5357 N 1
SFX 5357 0 تىسىگە .

SFX 5358 N 1
SFX 5358 0 فلار .

SFX 5359 N 1
SFX 5359 0 ۇرماق .

SFX 5360 N 1
SFX 5360 0 ارلىقلار .

SFX 5361 N 1
SFX 5361 0 انمەن .

SFX 5362 N 1
SFX 5362 0 غرىمنى .

SFX 5363 N 1
SFX 5363 0 ىقىغىمۇ .

SFX 5364 N 1
SFX 5364 0 اسلىقتىكى .

SFX 5365 N 1
SFX 5365 0 لىنىشىش .

SFX 5366 N 1
SFX 5366 0 ۇلاش .

SFX 5367 N 1
SFX 5367 0 ۇۋالغان .

SFX 5368 N 1
SFX 5368 0 نىمنىڭ .

SFX 5369 N 1
SFX 5369 0 پەرەسلەر .

SFX 5370 N 1
SFX 5370 0 ىملىك .

SFX 5371 N 1
SFX 5371 0 ىقىڭلارغا .

SFX 5372 N 1
SFX 5372 0 كلىرىدە .

SFX 5373 N 1
SFX 5373 0 نبۇلاق .

SFX 5374 N 1
SFX 5374 0 ۇرغۇچىغا .

SFX 5375 N 1
SFX 5375 0 ۋېلىشىڭىز .

SFX 5376 N 1
SFX 5376 0 قلىنىش .

SFX 5377 N 1
SFX 5377 0 تەكمۇ .

SFX 5378 N 1
SFX 5378 0 قكەنسىز .

SFX 5379 N 1
SFX 5379 0 للانىڭ .

SFX 5380 N 1
SFX 5380 0 الىسىلا .

SFX 5381 N 1
SFX 5381 0 ىغۇچىلارنىڭ .

SFX 5382 N 1
SFX 5382 0 للان .

SFX 5383 N 1
SFX 5383 0 لگەچكە .

SFX 5384 N 1
SFX 5384 0 ىگەنلىكىنى .

SFX 5385 N 1
SFX 5385 0 تۈرۈشۈش .

SFX 5386 N 1
SFX 5386 0 ىيەتكە .

SFX 5387 N 1
SFX 5387 0 اسلىقىمىز .

SFX 5388 N 1
SFX 5388 0 ۇلىدىن .

SFX 5389 N 1
SFX 5389 0 -مىڭلاپ .

SFX 5390 N 1
SFX 5390 0 ىرىمغىمۇ .

SFX 5391 N 1
SFX 5391 0 ۇلاردىن .

SFX 5392 N 1
SFX 5392 0 قچۇ .

SFX 5393 N 1
SFX 5393 0 المىلىق .

SFX 5394 N 1
SFX 5394 0 شلاردا .

SFX 5395 N 1
SFX 5395 0 رىڭلاردا .

SFX 5396 N 1
SFX 5396 0 ورىيەدە .

SFX 5397 N 1
SFX 5397 0 ۇچىلار .

SFX 5398 N 1
SFX 5398 0 دىيەنى .

SFX 5399 N 1
SFX 5399 0 اتون .

SFX 5400 N 1
SFX 5400 0 سىز-يوق .

SFX 5401 N 1
SFX 5401 0 ىنىڭگە .

SFX 5402 N 1
SFX 5402 0 يلىما .

SFX 5403 N 1
SFX 5403 0 ۇنغا .

SFX 5404 N 1
SFX 5404 0 رىغىچە .

SFX 5405 N 1
SFX 5405 0 ىپ .

SFX 5406 N 1
SFX 5406 0 قلىشىدۇ .

SFX 5407 N 1
SFX 5407 0 ەچ .

SFX 5408 N 1
SFX 5408 0 تىكىلەرمۇ .

SFX 5409 N 1
SFX 5409 0 مدىن .

SFX 5410 N 1
SFX 5410 0 دىغانلىقىم .

SFX 5411 N 1
SFX 5411 0 ىرچە .

SFX 5412 N 1
SFX 5412 0 ەللەرنىڭ .

SFX 5413 N 1
SFX 5413 0 نمايمىز .

SFX 5414 N 1
SFX 5414 0 تۈرۈۋەتكەن .

SFX 5415 N 1
SFX 5415 0 ۋازلىقى .

SFX 5416 N 1
SFX 5416 0 اشتۇرغان .

SFX 5417 N 1
SFX 5417 0 خۇنىڭ .

SFX 5418 N 1
SFX 5418 0 نمەك .

SFX 5419 N 1
SFX 5419 0 ۇلاپ .

SFX 5420 N 1
SFX 5420 0 املاردا .

SFX 5421 N 1
SFX 5421 0 ەتسەكلا .

SFX 5422 N 1
SFX 5422 0 ۇندا .

SFX 5423 N 1
SFX 5423 0 تقاندا .

SFX 5424 N 1
SFX 5424 0 لىل .

SFX 5425 N 1
SFX 5425 0 كۈم .

SFX 5426 N 1
SFX 5426 0 سىدىلا .

SFX 5427 N 1
SFX 5427 0 مىسىغا .

SFX 5428 N 1
SFX 5428 0 ەڭلىرىگە .

SFX 5429 N 1
SFX 5429 0 خىرى .

SFX 5430 N 1
SFX 5430 0 باشلا .

SFX 5431 N 1
SFX 5431 0 تاش .

SFX 5432 N 1
SFX 5432 0 ئۇس .

SFX 5433 N 1
SFX 5433 0 رىمنى .

SFX 5434 N 1
SFX 5434 0 ورىيەنىڭ .

SFX 5435 N 1
SFX 5435 0 سڭىز .

SFX 5436 N 1
SFX 5436 0 ولار .

SFX 5437 N 1
SFX 5437 0 زمەي .

SFX 5438 N 1
SFX 5438 0 اتلىقتىن .

SFX 5439 N 1
SFX 5439 0 رونولوگىيە .

SFX 5440 N 1
SFX 5440 0 ىنامىكىلىق .

SFX 5441 N 1
SFX 5441 0 سلىكتەك .

SFX 5442 N 1
SFX 5442 0 ۇلماق .

SFX 5443 N 1
SFX 5443 0 ناسىپ .

SFX 5444 N 1
SFX 5444 0 انلىقىمۇ .

SFX 5445 N 1
SFX 5445 0 ېتىشنى .

SFX 5446 N 1
SFX 5446 0 ىيەلمەيدىغان .

SFX 5447 N 1
SFX 5447 0 رەكلەرگە .

SFX 5448 N 1
SFX 5448 0 قاپ .

SFX 5449 N 1
SFX 5449 0 ىنىۋاتقاندەك .

SFX 5450 N 1
SFX 5450 0 ايلاش .

SFX 5451 N 1
SFX 5451 0 ىلىشىپ .

SFX 5452 N 1
SFX 5452 0 نىدىغان .

SFX 5453 N 1
SFX 5453 0 ايدۇ .

SFX 5454 N 1
SFX 5454 0 زۇمۇ .

SFX 5455 N 1
SFX 5455 0 ارىم .

SFX 5456 N 1
SFX 5456 0 ىككىچە .

SFX 5457 N 1
SFX 5457 0 ننىڭ .

SFX 5458 N 1
SFX 5458 0 ۇرىدىغىنى .

SFX 5459 N 1
SFX 5459 0 ۈشىدىن .

SFX 5460 N 1
SFX 5460 0 داقلار .

SFX 5461 N 1
SFX 5461 0 الىسام .

SFX 5462 N 1
SFX 5462 0 لىتىدىن .

SFX 5463 N 1
SFX 5463 0 ىلغاچقا .

SFX 5464 N 1
SFX 5464 0 ۈڭلارنىڭ .

SFX 5465 N 1
SFX 5465 0 شىدىغانلار .

SFX 5466 N 1
SFX 5466 0 ۇچنىڭ .

SFX 5467 N 1
SFX 5467 0 سلىكىمنى .

SFX 5468 N 1
SFX 5468 0 تلىكتۇر .

SFX 5469 N 1
SFX 5469 0 گىل .

SFX 5470 N 1
SFX 5470 0 ەيدىكەن .

SFX 5471 N 1
SFX 5471 0 ىنلىشىش .

SFX 5472 N 1
SFX 5472 0 ىنمىز .

SFX 5473 N 1
SFX 5473 0 ددەس .

SFX 5474 N 1
SFX 5474 0 ەتتىڭىزمۇ .

SFX 5475 N 1
SFX 5475 0 ىئا .

SFX 5476 N 1
SFX 5476 0 ىندۇر .

SFX 5477 N 1
SFX 5477 0 ەگنى .

SFX 5478 N 1
SFX 5478 0 ىغۇچ .

SFX 5479 N 1
SFX 5479 0 ىۋاتامسەن .

SFX 5480 N 1
SFX 5480 0 غىنىڭىز .

SFX 5481 N 1
SFX 5481 0 ۈپسەن .

SFX 5482 N 1
SFX 5482 0 لگەنلىكىنى .

SFX 5483 N 1
SFX 5483 0 مەپتىغۇ .

SFX 5484 N 1
SFX 5484 0 ەمنىمۇ .

SFX 5485 N 1
SFX 5485 0 لەيدىغانلىقى .

SFX 5486 N 1
SFX 5486 0 ستىت .

SFX 5487 N 1
SFX 5487 0 تاغا .

SFX 5488 N 1
SFX 5488 0 داڭنى .

SFX 5489 N 1
SFX 5489 0 چار .

SFX 5490 N 1
SFX 5490 0 -گۇچ .

SFX 5491 N 1
SFX 5491 0 ىنلىك .

SFX 5492 N 1
SFX 5492 0 قىمۇ .

SFX 5493 N 1
SFX 5493 0 ىكرون .

SFX 5494 N 1
SFX 5494 0 نىشىمنىڭ .

SFX 5495 N 1
SFX 5495 0 اۋنى .

SFX 5496 N 1
SFX 5496 0 ىغاننى .

SFX 5497 N 1
SFX 5497 0 ىزىمىز .

SFX 5498 N 1
SFX 5498 0 لۇقۇم .

SFX 5499 N 1
SFX 5499 0 ھەللا .

SFX 5500 N 1
SFX 5500 0 سىننىڭ .

SFX 5501 N 1
SFX 5501 0 يچە .

SFX 5502 N 1
SFX 5502 0 نلىرىم .

SFX 5503 N 1
SFX 5503 0 يوف .

SFX 5504 N 1
SFX 5504 0 لەشتۇق .

SFX 5505 N 1
SFX 5505 0 ىلىقىنى .

SFX 5506 N 1
SFX 5506 0 لىمىزگە .

SFX 5507 N 1
SFX 5507 0 پلىتىش .

SFX 5508 N 1
SFX 5508 0 قىلاردىن .

SFX 5509 N 1
SFX 5509 0 دۇم .

SFX 5510 N 1
SFX 5510 0 ۈچىسى .

SFX 5511 N 1
SFX 5511 0 ۈچىسىگە .

SFX 5512 N 1
SFX 5512 0 ىدىي .

SFX 5513 N 1
SFX 5513 0 انىڭىزنى .

SFX 5514 N 1
SFX 5514 0 چىسىمۇ .

SFX 5515 N 1
SFX 5515 0 ىگەنلىكىنىڭ .

SFX 5516 N 1
SFX 5516 0 ران .

SFX 5517 N 1
SFX 5517 0 ۇزىمەن .

SFX 5518 N 1
SFX 5518 0 قلىشىش .

SFX 5519 N 1
SFX 5519 0 مدۇ-قانداق .

SFX 5520 N 1
SFX 5520 0 لما .

SFX 5521 N 1
SFX 5521 0 گۇيلۇق .

SFX 5522 N 1
SFX 5522 0 ىرىمدە .

SFX 5523 N 1
SFX 5523 0 ىيلەر .

SFX 5524 N 1
SFX 5524 0 بۇكى .

SFX 5525 N 1
SFX 5525 0 ىسىگە .

SFX 5526 N 1
SFX 5526 0 رەمدە .

SFX 5527 N 1
SFX 5527 0 ىقكى .

SFX 5528 N 1
SFX 5528 0 پاسى .

SFX 5529 N 1
SFX 5529 0 تىلسا .

SFX 5530 N 1
SFX 5530 0 الغان .

SFX 5531 N 1
SFX 5531 0 كەنما .

SFX 5532 N 1
SFX 5532 0 ۇۋەتمەسلىك .

SFX 5533 N 1
SFX 5533 0 ىلىدۇر .

SFX 5534 N 1
SFX 5534 0 داشلىرىغا .

SFX 5535 N 1
SFX 5535 0 لەندۈرۈلۈش .

SFX 5536 N 1
SFX 5536 0 تىۋاتاتتى .

SFX 5537 N 1
SFX 5537 0 مىممۇ .

SFX 5538 N 1
SFX 5538 0 اشلىرىمنىڭ .

SFX 5539 N 1
SFX 5539 0 ىتلىرى .

SFX 5540 N 1
SFX 5540 0 ىيەسىنى .

SFX 5541 N 1
SFX 5541 0 تچىلىرى .

SFX 5542 N 1
SFX 5542 0 ماي .

SFX 5543 N 1
SFX 5543 0 -ئاخشىمى .

SFX 5544 N 1
SFX 5544 0 ماك .

SFX 5545 N 1
SFX 5545 0 ۈچمۇ .

SFX 5546 N 1
SFX 5546 0 رەكتىن .

SFX 5547 N 1
SFX 5547 0 باغنىڭ .

SFX 5548 N 1
SFX 5548 0 ادامەت .

SFX 5549 N 1
SFX 5549 0 ېتە .

SFX 5550 N 1
SFX 5550 0 كىدەك .

SFX 5551 N 1
SFX 5551 0 تىۋېلىش .

SFX 5552 N 1
SFX 5552 0 ىرەنىڭ .

SFX 5553 N 1
SFX 5553 0 تتى .

SFX 5554 N 1
SFX 5554 0 مىتىمىز .

SFX 5555 N 1
SFX 5555 0 وگىيەنى .

SFX 5556 N 1
SFX 5556 0 ىڭنى .

SFX 5557 N 1
SFX 5557 0 الىرىدا .

SFX 5558 N 1
SFX 5558 0 ېلىشتى .

SFX 5559 N 1
SFX 5559 0 رتا .

SFX 5560 N 1
SFX 5560 0 خانلارنى .

SFX 5561 N 1
SFX 5561 0 تسىڭىزمۇ .

SFX 5562 N 1
SFX 5562 0 ەيۋاتقانلىقىنى .

SFX 5563 N 1
SFX 5563 0 ۇچىدىكى .

SFX 5564 N 1
SFX 5564 0 ەرسىلەر .

SFX 5565 N 1
SFX 5565 0 تتىمكى .

SFX 5566 N 1
SFX 5566 0 ەرلە .

SFX 5567 N 1
SFX 5567 0 ىلدا .

SFX 5568 N 1
SFX 5568 0 لىگەنىدى .

SFX 5569 N 1
SFX 5569 0 ندۈرمەك .

SFX 5570 N 1
SFX 5570 0 قلىقى .

SFX 5571 N 1
SFX 5571 0 ۋا .

SFX 5572 N 1
SFX 5572 0 ېلىڭ .

SFX 5573 N 1
SFX 5573 0 اقچىلىق .

SFX 5574 N 1
SFX 5574 0 لغىنىمىز .

SFX 5575 N 1
SFX 5575 0 يمىدى .

SFX 5576 N 1
SFX 5576 0 لىرىڭنى .

SFX 5577 N 1
SFX 5577 0 ىزدىكىنى .

SFX 5578 N 1
SFX 5578 0 اللارنىڭ .

SFX 5579 N 1
SFX 5579 0 ندىدەك .

SFX 5580 N 1
SFX 5580 0 تىكىدىكى .
